Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4332.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2670. (1) A person shall not conduct pathogen enhancement engineering or research. (2) A person that violates subsection (1) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, a fine of not more than $100,000.00, or both. (3) If an individual reports conduct to the department that leads to the discovery that another person is violating subsection (1), the department shall reward that individual with $50,000.00. (4) The department shall notify individuals who are employed by biological research facilities of the potential for a reward under subsection (3). The department shall also create and distribute to individuals described under this subsection education materials that include the Biological Weapons Convention Treaty and 18 USC 175. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Pathogen enhancement engineering or research" means the act of altering a naturally or synthetically derived pathogen to enhance environmental persistence, transmissibility, pathogenicity, infectivity, or virulence. (b) "Person" means that term as defined in section 1106 or a governmental entity.